Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1712
Additional security; insurance; existing policies; acceptance.

When credit life insurance or credit accident and health insurance is required as additional security for any indebtedness, the debtor shall, upon request to the creditor, have the option of furnishing the required amount of insurance through existing policies of insurance owned or controlled by him or of procuring and furnishing the required coverage through any insurer authorized to transact an insurance business within this state.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 12, p. 743.